Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 2 Termination of Entities
4-29-242. Governmental entities terminated on June 30, 2021.

The following governmental entities terminate on June 30, 2021:

Advisory council on workers' compensation, created by § 50-6-121;

Alcoholic beverage commission, created by § 57-1-102;

Austin Peay State University, board of trustees, created by §§ 49-8-101 and 49-8-201;

Beef promotion board, created by § 43-29-118;

Board of chiropractic examiners, created by § 63-4-102;

Board of communication disorders and sciences, created by § 63-17-104;

Board of dentistry, created by § 63-5-101;

Board of dispensing opticians, created by § 63-14-101;

Board of examiners in psychology, created by § 63-11-101;

Board of medical examiners' committee on physician assistants, created by § 63-19-103;

Board of nursing, created by § 63-7-201;

Board of optometry, created by § 63-8-103;

Board of podiatric medical examiners, created by § 63-3-103;

Board of veterinary medical examiners, created by § 63-12-104;

Bureau of ethics and campaign finance, created by § 4-55-101;

Committee for purchase from the blind and other severely disabled, created by § 71-4-703;

Consumer advocate division in the office of the attorney general and reporter, created by § 65-4-118;

Delta human resource agency, created by § 13-26-102;

Department of children's services, created by §§ 4-3-101 and 37-5-101;

Department of economic and community development, created by §§ 4-3-101 and 4-3-701;

Department of financial institutions, created by §§ 4-3-101 and 4-3-401;

Department of mental health and substance abuse services, created by §§ 4-3-101 and 4-3-1601;

East Tennessee human resource agency, created by § 13-26-102;

East Tennessee State University, board of trustees, created by §§ 49-8-101 and 49-8-201:

Egg promotion board, created by § 43-29-120;

Emergency communications board, created by § 7-86-302;

First Tennessee human resource agency, created by § 13-26-102;

Health services and development agency, created by § 68-11-1604;

[Deleted by 2018 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

James K. Polk memorial association, created by § 4-13-201;

Mid-Cumberland human resource agency, created by § 13-26-102;

Middle Tennessee State University, board of trustees, created by §§ 49-8-101 and 49-8-201:

Northwest Tennessee human resource agency, created by § 13-26-102;

Occupational safety and health review commission, created by § 50-3-801;

Ocoee River recreation and economic development fund board, created by § 11-8-104;

Pork promotion board, created by § 43-29-119;

Private probation services council, created by § 16-3-901;

Regional transportation authority of Middle Tennessee, created by § 64-8-101;

Second look commission, created by § 37-3-803;

South Central Tennessee human resource agency, created by § 13-26-102;

Southeast Tennessee human resource agency, created by § 13-26-102;

Southeastern Interstate Forest Fire Protection Compact, created by § 11-4-501;

Southwest Tennessee human resource agency, created by § 13-26-102;

State Alzheimer's disease and related dementia advisory council, created by § 71-2-117;

State board of equalization, created by § 4-3-5101;

State board of examiners for land surveyors, created by § 62-18-103;

State forestry commission, created by § 11-4-201;

State TennCare pharmacy advisory committee, created by § 71-5-2401;

State textbook and instructional materials quality commission, created by § 49-6-2201;

Statewide community services agency, created by § 37-5-305;

Statewide planning and policy council for the department of mental health and substance abuse services, created by § 33-1-401;

Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations, created by § 4-10-102;

Tennessee aeronautics commission, created by § 42-2-301;

Tennessee athletic commission, created by § 68-115-103;

Tennessee board of judicial conduct, created by § 17-5-201;

Tennessee bureau of investigation, created by § 38-6-101;

Tennessee council for career and technical education, created by § 49-11-201;

Tennessee council on autism spectrum disorder, created by § 4-3-2711;

Tennessee dairy promotion committee, created by § 44-19-114;

Tennessee financial literacy commission, created by § 49-6-1702;

Tennessee public charter school commission, as created by § 49-13-105;

Tennessee public utility commission, created by § 65-1-101;

Tennessee soybean promotion board, created by § 43-20-102;

Tennessee State University, board of trustees, created by §§ 49-8-101 and 49-8-201;

Tennessee Technological University, board of trustees, created by §§ 49-8-101 and 49-8-201;

Tennessee technology development corporation, created by § 4-14-301;

Tennessee wine and grape board, created by § 57-3-1101;

University of Memphis, board of trustees, created by §§ 49-8-101 and 49-8-201; and

Upper Cumberland human resource agency, created by § 13-26-102.

Each department, commission, board, agency, or council of state government created during calendar year 2019 shall terminate on June 30, 2021.

Any governmental entity that has been terminated under this section may be continued, reestablished, or restructured in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 2015, ch. 96, § 2; 2015, ch. 97, § 2; 2015, ch. 98, § 2; 2015, ch. 100, § 2; 2015, ch. 101, § 2; 2015, ch. 102, § 2; 2015, ch. 103, § 2; 2015, ch. 104, § 2; 2015, ch. 105, § 2; 2015, ch. 106, § 2; 2015, ch. 107, § 2; 2015, ch. 108, § 2; 2015, ch. 109, § 2; 2015, ch. 147, § 2; 2015, ch. 148, § 2; 2015, ch. 149, § 2; 2015, ch. 150, § 2; 2015, ch. 151, § 2; 2015, ch. 174, § 2; 2016, ch. 539, § 2; 2016, ch. 542, § 2; 2017, ch. 38, § 2; 2017, ch. 39, § 2; 2017, ch. 40, § 2; 2017, ch. 41, § 2; 2017, ch. 42, § 2; 2017, ch. 43, § 2; 2017, ch. 44, § 2; 2017, ch. 46, § 2; 2017, ch. 47, § 2; 2017, ch. 49, § 2; 2017, ch. 51, § 2; 2017, ch. 52, § 2; 2017, ch. 59, § 2; 2017, ch. 68, § 2; 2017, ch. 70, § 2; 2017, ch. 73, § 2; 2017, ch. 75, § 2; 2017, ch. 77, § 2; 2017, ch. 94, § 6; 2017, ch. 115, § 2; 2017, ch. 116, § 2; 2017, ch. 315, § 2; 2017, ch. 316, § 2; 2017, ch. 317, § 2; 2017, ch. 319, § 2; 2017, ch. 321, § 2; 2017, ch. 323, § 2; 2017, ch. 435, § 2; 2018, ch. 518, § 2; 2018, ch. 530, § 2; 2018, ch. 653, § 2; 2018, ch. 702, § 2; 2018, ch. 928, § 1; 2019, ch. 49, § 2; 2019, ch. 57, § 2; 2019, ch. 219, § 102; 2019, ch. 294, § 2; 2019, ch. 295, § 2; 2019, ch. 296, § 2; 2019, ch. 297, § 2; 2019, ch. 298, § 2; 2019, ch. 299, § 2; 2019, ch. 335, § 2; 2019, ch. 364, § 1; 2019, ch. 369, § 2; 2019, ch. 406, § 2; 2019, ch. 444, § 4; 2020, ch. 637, § 2; 2020, ch. 767, § 2; 2020, ch. 769, § 2.

4-29-243. Governmental entities terminated on June 30, 2022.

The following governmental entities shall terminate on June 30, 2022:

Advisory board for rehabilitation centers, created by § 49-11-704;

Applied behavior analyst licensing committee of the board of examiners in psychology, created by § 63-11-303;

Archaeological advisory council, created by § 11-6-103;

Board of athletic trainers, created by § 63-24-102;

Board of dietitian/nutritionist examiners, created by § 63-25-106;

Board of examiners for nursing home administrators, created by § 63-16-102;

Board of parole, created by § 40-28-103;

Board of respiratory care, created by § 63-27-103;

Bureau of TennCare within the department of finance and administration, pursuant to Executive Order No. 23 on October 19, 1999;

Council for licensing hearing instrument specialists, created by § 63-17-202;

Council of certified professional midwifery, created by § 63-29-103;

Council on children's mental health care, created by § 37-3-111;

Department of agriculture, created by §§ 4-3-101 and 4-3-201;

Department of education, created by §§ 4-3-101 and 4-3-801;

Department of human services, created by §§ 4-3-101 and 4-3-1201;

Department of revenue, created by §§ 4-3-101 and 4-3-1901;

Department of tourist development, created by §§ 4-3-101 and 4-3-2201;

Department of veterans services, created by §§ 4-3-101 and 4-3-2501;

Domestic violence state coordinating council, created by § 38-12-101;

Great Smoky Mountains Park commission, created by § 11-19-101;

Housing development agency, board of directors, created by § 13-23-104;

Interstate Compact on Mental Health, created by § 33-9-201;

Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, created by § 37-4-201;

Interstate Insurance Product Regulation Compact of 2007, created by § 56-58-101;

Local government planning advisory committee, created by § 4-3-727;

Memphis regional megasite authority, created pursuant to § 64-6-101;

Pest control advisory board, created by § 62-21-104;

School bond authority, created by § 49-3-1204;

Southeast Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact, created by § 68-202-701;

State board of cosmetology and barber examiners, created by §§ 62-3-101 and 62-4-103;

State family support council, created by § 33-5-208;

State soil conservation committee, created by § 43-14-203;

State university and community college system, board of regents, created by § 49-8-201;

Statewide planning and policy council for the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities, created by § 33-5-601;

Tellico Reservoir development agency, created by § 64-1-701;

Tennessee advisory committee for acupuncture, created by § 63-6-1003;

Tennessee arts commission, created by § 4-20-101;

Tennessee center for earthquake research and information, created by § 49-8-602;

Tennessee emergency medical services board, created by § 68-140-303;

Tennessee equine health advisory commission, created by § 43-13-103;

Tennessee film, entertainment and music commission, created by § 4-3-5003;

Tennessee fish and wildlife commission, created by § 70-1-201;

Tennessee higher education commission, created by § 49-7-201;

Tennessee life and health insurance guaranty association, created by § 56-12-205;

Tennessee massage licensure board, created by § 63-18-103;

Tennessee medical laboratory board, created by § 68-29-109;

Tennessee rare disease advisory council, created by § 71-7-101;

Tennessee rehabilitative initiative in correction board, created by § 41-22-404;

Tennessee residence commission, created by § 4-23-202;

Tennessee sports hall of fame, created by § 4-3-5403;

Tennessee student assistance corporation, board of directors, created by § 49-4-202;

Water and wastewater operators, board of certification, created by § 68-221-905; and

West Fork Drakes Creek dam and reservoir interstate authority, created by § 64-1-901.

Each department, commission, board, agency or council of state government created during calendar year 2020 terminates on June 30, 2022.

Any governmental entity that has been terminated under this section may be continued, reestablished, or restructured in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 2014, ch. 495, § 2; 2016, ch. 535, § 2; 2016, ch. 536, § 2; 2016, ch. 538, § 2; 2016, ch. 541, § 2; 2016, ch. 543, § 2; 2016, ch. 547, § 2; 2016, ch. 551, § 2; 2016, ch. 552, § 2; 2016, ch. 553, § 2; 2016, ch. 554, § 2; 2016, ch. 555, § 2; 2016, ch. 559, § 2; 2016, ch. 565, § 2; 2016, ch. 566, § 2; 2016, ch. 568, § 2; 2016, ch. 609, § 2; 2016, ch. 611, § 2; 2016, ch. 612, § 2; 2016, ch. 613, § 2; 2016, ch. 615, § 2; 2016, ch. 616, § 2; 2016, ch. 772, § 2; 2016, ch. 775, § 2; 2017, ch. 57, § 2; 2017, ch. 67, § 2; 2017, ch. 69, § 2; 2017, ch. 74, § 2; 2017, ch. 76, § 2; 2018, ch. 494, § 2; 2018, ch. 505, § 2; 2018, ch. 507, § 2; 2018, ch. 508, § 2; 2018, ch. 564, § 2; 2018, ch. 565, § 2; 2018, ch. 566, § 2; 2018, ch. 567, § 2; 2018, ch. 701, § 2; 2018, ch. 703, § 2; 2018, ch. 705, § 2; 2018, ch. 706, § 2; 2018, ch. 802, § 2; 2018, ch. 831, § 2; 2018, ch. 832, § 2; 2018, ch. 927, § 2; 2019, ch. 336, § 2; 2019, ch. 493, § 2; 2020, ch. 616, § 2; 2020, ch. 617, § 2; 2020, ch. 640, § 14; 2020, ch. 645, § 2; 2020, ch. 666, § 2; 2020, ch. 808, § 1.

4-29-244. Governmental entities terminated on June 30, 2023. [See contingent amendment to subdivision (a)(24) and Compiler's Notes.]

The following governmental entities shall terminate on June 30, 2023:

Board for licensing healthcare facilities, created by § 68-11-203;

Board for professional counselors, marital and family therapists, and clinical pastoral therapists, created by § 63-22-101;

Board of appeals for the department of human resources, created by § 8-30-108;

Board of boiler rules, created by § 68-122-101;

Board of medical examiners, created by § 63-6-101;

Board of pharmacy, created by § 63-10-301;

Board of trustees of the college savings trust fund program, created by § 49-7-804;

Controlled substance database advisory committee, created by § 53-10-303;

Department of commerce and insurance, created by §§ 4-3-101 and 4-3-1301;

Department of environment and conservation, created by §§ 4-3-101 and 4-3-501;

Department of health, created by §§ 4-3-101 and 4-3-1801;

Department of human resources, created by §§ 4-3-101 and 4-3-1701;

Department of intellectual and developmental disabilities, created by §§ 4-3-101 and 4-3-2701;

Department of safety, created by §§ 4-3-101 and 4-3-2001;

Doe Mountain recreation authority, created by § 11-25-103;

Elevator and amusement device safety board, created by § 68-121-102;

Employee suggestion award board, created by § 4-27-102;

Energy efficient schools council, created by § 49-17-103;

Prevailing wage commission, created by § 12-4-404;

Sam Davis memorial association, board of trustees, created by § 4-13-301;

Selection panel for TennCare reviewers, created by § 56-32-126;

State unemployment compensation advisory council, created by § 50-7-606;

[Deleted by 2019 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Current version. See second version for contingent amendment and Compiler's Notes.]

Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas, created by § 69-3-104;

[Contingent amendment. See the Compiler's Notes.]

Tennessee consolidated retirement system, board of trustees, created by § 8-34-301;

Tennessee heritage conservation trust fund board of trustees, created by § 11-7-104;

Tennessee interagency cash flow committee, created by § 9-4-610;

Tennessee state veterans' homes board, created by § 58-7-102;

Underground storage tanks and solid waste disposal control board, created by § 68-211-111; and

Underground utility damage enforcement board, created by § 65-31-114.

Each department, commission, board, agency, or council of state government created during calendar year 2021 terminates on June 30, 2023.

Any governmental entity that has been terminated under this section may be continued, reestablished, or restructured in accordance with this chapter.

Tennessee board of energy and natural resources, created by §69-3-104;

Acts 2016, ch. 558, § 2; 2017, ch. 324, § 2; 2018, ch. 504, § 2; 2018, ch. 521, § 2; 2018, ch. 522, § 2; 2018, ch. 531, § 2; 2018, ch. 704, § 2; 2018, ch. 839, § 4; 2018, ch. 955, § 1; 2019, ch. 46, § 2; 2019, ch. 47, § 2; 2019, ch. 50, § 2; 2019, ch. 54, § 2; 2019, ch. 56, § 2; 2019, ch. 73, § 1; 2019, ch. 113, § 2; 2019, ch. 115, § 2; 2019, ch. 285, § 2; 2019, ch. 286, § 2; 2019, ch. 287, § 2; 2019, ch. 288, § 2; 2019, ch. 289, § 2; 2019, ch. 290, § 2; 2019, ch. 291, § 2; 2019, ch. 293, § 2; 2019, ch. 333, § 2; 2019, ch. 368, § 2; 2020, ch. 538, § 2; 2020, ch. 541, § 2; 2020, ch. 612, § 2; 2020, ch. 613, § 2; 2020, ch. 634, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 4 purported to amend §4-29-239 by substituting “Tennessee board of energy and natural resources” for “Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas” in (a); however, the 2018 amendment by ch. 704, already deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas, created by §69-3-104, which were transferred to this section by Acts 2018, ch. 704, § 2, effective April 12, 2018. Therefore the amendment was implemented in this section.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall take effect, including for purposes of rulemaking, upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment by ch. 839 substituted “Tennessee board of energy and natural resources” for “Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

4-29-245. Governmental entities terminated on June 30, 2024.

The following governmental entities shall terminate on June 30, 2024:

Advisory council on state procurement, created by § 4-56-106;

Board of funeral directors and embalmers, created by § 62-5-201;

Bureau of workers' compensation, created by § 4-3-1408;

Child care agency licensing board of review, created by § 71-3-510;

Collection service board, created by § 62-20-104;

Commission for uniform legislation, created by § 4-9-101;

Commission on children and youth, created by § 37-3-102;

Compact for Education, created by § 49-12-201;

Department of correction, created by §§ 4-3-101 and 4-3-601;

Department of finance and administration, created by §§ 4-3-101 and 4-3-1001;

Department of general services, created by §§ 4-3-101 and 4-3-1101;

Department of labor and workforce development, created by §§ 4-3-101 and 4-3-1403;

Department of transportation, created by §§ 4-3-101 and 4-3-2301;

Interstate Mining Compact, created by § 59-10-101;

Medical advisory committee, created by § 50-6-135;

Medical payment committee, created by § 50-6-125;

Private investigation and polygraph commission, created by § 62-26-301;

Public records commission, created by § 10-7-302;

Real estate appraiser commission, created by § 62-39-201;

Real estate commission, created by § 62-13-201;

Standards committee, department of children's services, created by § 37-5-516;

State board of education, created by § 49-1-301;

State election commission, created by § 2-11-101;

State energy policy council, created by § 68-204-101;

State funding board, created by § 9-9-101;

State procurement commission, created by § 4-56-102;

State protest committee, created by § 4-56-103;

Tennessee auctioneer commission, created by § 62-19-104;

Tennessee board of court reporting, created by § 20-9-604;

Tennessee central economic authority, created by § 64-5-101;

Tennessee corrections institute, board of control, created by § 41-7-105;

Tennessee-Tombigbee waterway development authority, created by § 69-8-101;

Trial court vacancy commission, created by § 17-4-301; and

University of Tennessee, board of trustees, created by § 49-9-202.

Each department, commission, board, agency, or council of state government created during calendar year 2022 terminates on June 30, 2024.

Any governmental entity that has been terminated under this section may be continued, reestablished, or restructured in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 2016, ch. 557, § 2; 2016, ch. 562, § 2; 2016, ch. 563, § 2; 2016, ch. 567, § 2; 2018, ch. 500, § 2; 2018, ch. 502, § 2; 2018, ch. 503, § 2; 2018, ch. 511, § 2; 2018, ch. 513, § 2; 2018, ch. 514, § 2; 2018, ch. 516, § 2; 2018, ch. 519, § 2; 2018, ch. 520, § 2; 2018, ch. 532, § 2; 2018, ch. 533, § 2; 2018, ch. 534, § 2; 2018, ch. 563, § 2; 2019, ch. 33, § 2; 2019, ch. 51, § 2; 2019, ch. 166, § 2; 2019, ch. 292, § 2; 2020, ch. 543, § 2; 2020, ch. 553, § 2; 2020, ch. 559, § 2; 2020, ch. 562, § 2; 2020, ch. 564, § 2; 2020, ch. 633, § 2; 2020, ch. 639, § 2; 2020, ch. 656, § 2; 2020, ch. 657, § 2; 2020, ch. 671, § 2; 2020, ch. 672, § 2; 2020, ch. 678, § 2; 2020, ch. 695, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. The state procurement commission, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§4-29-112,4-29-245.

4-29-246. Governmental entities terminated on June 30, 2025.

The following governmental entities shall terminate on June 30, 2025:

Advisory committee for children's special services, created by § 68-12-106;

Air pollution control board, created by § 68-201-104;

Board of alcohol and drug abuse counselors, created by § 68-24-601;

Board of claims, created by § 9-8-101;

Board of ground water management, created by § 69-10-107;

Board of occupational therapy, created by § 63-13-216;

Board of osteopathic examination, created by § 63-9-101;

Board of physical therapy, created by § 63-13-318;

Chickasaw basin authority, created by § 64-1-201;

Civil Defense and Disaster Compact, created by § 58-2-402;

Commission on firefighting personnel standards and education, created by § 4-24-101;

Council on pensions and insurance, created by § 3-9-101;

Douglas Henry state museum commission, created by § 4-20-301;

Emergency Management Assistance Compact, created by § 58-2-403;

Genetic advisory committee, created by § 68-5-503;

Human rights commission, created by § 4-21-201;

Industrial development division, building finance committee, created by § 4-14-109;

Information systems council, created by § 4-3-5501;

Interstate Compact on Detainers, created by § 40-31-101;

Interstate Corrections Compact, created by § 41-23-102;

Interstate Earthquake Compact of 1988, created by § 58-2-701;

Perinatal advisory committee, created by § 68-1-803;

Standards committee, department of human services, created by § 71-3-511;

Tennessee claims commission, created by § 9-8-301;

Tennessee code commission, created by § 1-1-101;

Tennessee community resource board, created by § 41-10-105.

Tennessee emergency management agency, created by §§ 58-2-103 and 58-2-104;

Tennessee historical commission, created by § 4-11-102;

Tennessee medical examiner advisory council, created by § 38-7-201;

Tennessee peace officers standards and training commission, created by § 38-8-102;

Tennessee public television council, created by § 49-50-905;

Tennessee wars commission, created by § 4-11-301;

Traumatic brain injury advisory council, created by § 68-55-102; and

Wastewater financing board, created by § 68-221-1008.

Each department, commission, board, agency, or council of state government created during calendar year 2023 terminates on June 30, 2025.

Any governmental entity that has been terminated under this section may be continued, reestablished, or restructured in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 2017, ch. 48, § 2; 2017, ch. 54, § 2; 2017, ch. 55, § 2; 2017, ch. 71, § 2; 2017, ch. 72, § 2; 2019, ch. 14, § 2; 2019, ch. 15, § 2; 2019, ch. 16, § 2; 2019, ch. 17, § 2; 2019, ch. 18, § 2; 2019, ch. 19, § 2; 2019, ch. 22, § 2; 2019, ch. 23, § 2; 2019, ch. 24, § 2; 2019, ch. 25, § 2; 2019, ch. 26, § 2; 2019, ch. 27, § 2; 2019, ch. 28, § 2; 2019, ch. 29, § 2; 2019, ch. 34, § 2; 2019, ch. 43, § 2; 2019, ch. 48, § 2; 2019, ch. 52, § 2; 2019, ch. 53, § 2; 2019, ch. 55, § 2; 2019, ch. 114, § 2; 2019, ch. 212, § 2; 2020, ch. 542, § 2; 2020, ch. 545, § 2; 2020, ch. 547, § 2; 2020, ch. 566, § 2; 2020, ch. 614, § 2; 2020, ch. 663, § 2; 2020, ch. 702, § 2.

4-29-247. Governmental entities terminated on June 30, 2026.

The following governmental entities shall terminate on June 30, 2026:

Board of examiners for architects and engineers, created by § 62-2-201;

Board of social work licensure, created by § 63-23-101;

Collateral pool board, created by § 9-4-506;

Committee for clinical perfusionists, created by § 63-28-112;

Integrated criminal justice steering committee, created by § 16-3-815;

Interstate Compact for Juveniles, created by § 37-4-101;

Interstate Compact for Supervision of Adult Offenders, created by § 40-28-401;

Local education insurance committee, created by § 8-27-301;

Local government insurance committee, created by § 8-27-701;

Office of business enterprise, created by § 4-26-101;

Post-conviction defender oversight commission, created by § 40-30-203;

Sequatchie Valley educational development agency, created by §§ 64-1-501 and 64-1-502;

Sex offender treatment board, created by § 39-13-704;

State board for licensing contractors, created by § 62-6-104;

State board of accountancy, created by § 62-1-104;

State building commission, created by § 4-15-101;

State capitol commission, created by § 4-8-301;

State insurance committee, created by § 8-27-201;

Tennessee commission on aging and disability, created by § 71-2-104;

Tennessee motor vehicle commission, created by § 55-17-103; and

Utility management review board, created by § 7-82-701.

Each department, commission, board, agency, or council of state government created during calendar year 2024 terminates on June 30, 2026.

Any governmental entity that has been terminated under this section may be continued, reestablished, or restructured in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 2018, ch. 501, § 2; 2018, ch. 509, § 2; 2018, ch. 510, § 2; 2018, ch. 515, § 2; 2018, ch. 517, § 2; 2020, ch. 539, § 2; 2020, ch. 546, § 2; 2020, ch. 549, § 2; 2020, ch. 550, § 2; 2020, ch. 556, § 2; 2020, ch. 557, § 2; 2020, ch. 558, § 2; 2020, ch. 560, § 2; 2020, ch. 563, § 2; 2020, ch. 567, § 2; 2020, ch. 569, § 2; 2020, ch. 611, § 2; 2020, ch. 615, § 2; 2020, ch. 638, § 2; 2020, ch. 664, § 2; 2020, ch. 768, § 2.

4-29-248. Governmental entities terminated on June 30, 2027.

The following governmental entities terminate on June 30, 2027:

Advisory council for the education of students with disabilities, created by § 49-10-105;

Child care advisory council, created by § 49-1-302;

Dyslexia advisory council, created by § 49-1-229;

Southern states energy board, created by § 68-202-601;

Southern States Nuclear Compact, created by § 68-202-601; and

Southern Regional Education Compact, created by § 49-12-101;

State palliative care and quality of life council, created by § 71-2-116;

Tennessee agricultural hall of fame board, created by § 43-1-601; and

Tennessee council for the deaf, deaf-blind, and hard of hearing, created by § 71-4-2102.

Each department, commission, board, agency, or council of state government created during calendar year 2025 terminates on June 30, 2027.

Any governmental entity that has been terminated under this section may be continued, reestablished, or restructured in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 2019, ch. 20, § 2; 2019, ch. 21, § 2; 2019, ch. 30, § 2; 2019, ch. 31, § 2; 2019, ch. 32, § 2; 2020, ch. 537, § 2; 2020, ch. 544, § 2; 2020, ch. 555, § 2; 2020, ch. 561, § 2; 2020, ch. 565, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. The viticulture advisory board, which was transferred to this section by Acts 2019, ch. 21, § 2, was subsequently repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 444, § 3.

4-29-249. Governmental entities terminated on June 30, 2028.

The following governmental entities terminate on June 30, 2028:

Beech River watershed development authority, board of directors, created by § 64-1-101;

Board of law examiners, created by § 23-1-101;

Carroll County watershed authority, created by § 64-1-801;

Interstate Nurse Licensure Compact, created by § 63-7-401;

Physical therapy licensure compact, created by § 63-13-401;

Rail service authorities, created by § 7-56-201;

South Central Tennessee railroad authority, created by § 64-2-201;

Tennessee Duck River development agency, created by §§ 64-1-601 and 64-1-602;

Tri-county railroad authority, created by § 64-2-301; and

West Tennessee River basin authority, created by § 64-1-1101.

Each department, commission, board, agency, or council of state government created during calendar year 2026 terminates on June 30, 2028.

Any governmental entity that has been terminated under this section may be continued, reestablished, or restructured in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 2020, ch. 540, § 2; 2020, ch. 548, § 2; 2020, ch. 551, § 2; 2020, ch. 552, § 2; 2020, ch. 554, § 2; 2020, ch. 568, § 2; 2020, ch. 661, § 2; 2020, ch. 662, § 2; 2020, ch. 665, § 2; 2020, ch. 667, § 2.

4-29-234. Governmental entities terminated on June 30, 2013.